Rhode Island, session 2025, SB889.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 16-100-2 and 16-100-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-100
entitled "Dual Enrollment Equal Opportunity Act" are hereby amended to read as follows:
16-100-2. Definition.
“Dual Enrollment” means that a student is enrolled in a secondary school while
simultaneously enrolled part-time or full-time at a local institution of higher learning Rhode Island
public higher education institution, such as a community college, college, or university.
16-100-3. Policy implemented.
(a) The board of education shall prescribe by regulation a statewide dual enrollment policy
that shall allow students to enroll in courses at postsecondary institutions public higher education
institutions, such as a community college, college, or university, to satisfy academic credit
requirements in both high school and the aforementioned postsecondary institutions public higher
education institutions. The regulations shall address the postsecondary public higher education
institution’s graduation requirements, if any; the institution’s ability to award degrees/certificates
in Rhode Island; the minimum course grade to receive credit at the student’s secondary school; and
any other criteria that the board deems appropriate.
(b) The board shall convene a workgroup, including, but not limited to, representatives
from the department of elementary and secondary education, the office of the postsecondary
commissioner, superintendents, school committees, public higher education institutions, guidance
counselors, and teachers. The purpose of the workgroup is to consider and advise the board as to a

dual enrollment policy and its possible effect on school funding pursuant to chapter 7.2 of this title;
academic supports; transportation; possible shared costs of the education; possible fee schedules;
manners in which low-income students could access the program; and possible contracted tuition
costs with our public higher education institutions.
(c) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, payments to public institutions of higher
education institutions for dual and concurrent enrollment shall be limited to no greater than the
appropriation contained in the appropriations act. On or before September 30, 2017, the council on
postsecondary education shall promulgate rules and regulations enforcing this limitation.
(d) Students in grade twelve (12) enrolled full-time, as defined by the institution, in a dual
enrollment program where the courses are taken on a higher education institution campus at a public
higher education institution shall be exempt from the requirements set forth in § 16-22-4(a).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002615
========
LC002615 - Page 2 of 3